test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3makizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imakizinensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imakizinensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imakizinensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imakizinensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakizinensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakizinensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakizinensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakizinensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakizinensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakizinensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakizinensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakizinensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakizinensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakizinensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imakizinenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imakizinenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imakizinenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imakizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imakizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imakizinenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imakizinenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imakizinenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imakizinenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imakizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imakizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imakizinenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imakizinenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imakizinenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imakizinenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmakizin+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imakizinenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
